Tennessee, session 114, HB0961.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 1-1-108(a), is amended by deleting
"civil justice committee of the house of representatives" and substituting "committee of the
house of representatives with jurisdiction over subject matters pertaining to the code
commission".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0961
002063
- 1 -